Idaho statutes. Title 12 COSTS AND MISCELLANEOUS MATTERS IN CIVIL ACTIONS
Chapter 5
SERVICE OF PAPERS, NOTICE AND APPEARANCE

Sec.

§ 12-501. Service of notice and papers. [Repealed.]

§ 12-502, 12-503. Service by mail — When permitted — How made. [Repealed.]

§ 12-504. Appearance. [Repealed.]

§ 12-505. Service on nonresident. [Repealed.]

§ 12-506. Limitation on foregoing provisions. [Repealed.]

§ 12-507. Service by telegraph. [Repealed.]